utilities/dictionaries/uk_UK-Ukrainian.aff
SFX Y Y 5
SFX Y 'я 'я м'я
SFX Y 'я 'їв м'я
SFX Y 'я 'ям м'я
SFX Y 'я 'ями м'я
SFX Y 'я 'ях м'я
SFX Z Y 13
SFX Z я ів [лр]я
SFX Z е ів [лр]е
SFX Z я ям [лр]я
SFX Z е ям [лр]е
SFX Z я ями [лр]я
SFX Z е ями [лр]е
SFX Z я ях [лр]я
SFX Z е ях [лр]е
SFX Z о а о
SFX Z о ів о
SFX Z о ам о
SFX Z о ами о
SFX Z о ах о
